Missouri, session 2026, SB877.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 536, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
two new sections, to be known as sections 536.180 and 536.185,
to read as follows:
536.180. 1. Any state agency filing a notice of
proposed rulemaking, as required by section 536.021, wherein
the adoption, amendment, or rescission of the rule would, as
determined by the fiscal note required under this chapter,
require or result in an expenditure of public funds by that
agency, any other state agency, or any political subdivision
of the state in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars
per year, or would require or result in an expenditure of
money by or a reduction in income for individuals or
businesses in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars
per year shall, in addition to the requirements of section
536.200, file notification with the joint committee on
administrative rules of such proposed rule. The committee
may hold hearings on any proposed rule or portion thereof at
any time. A final order of rulemaking shall not be filed
with the secretary of state until at least thirty days after
such final order of rulemaking has been received by the
committee.

SB 877 2
2. Any proposed rule subject to the provisions of this
section shall not be subject to section 536.021 and shall
not become effective until the provisions of this section
have been satisfied.
3. A proposed rule subject to the provisions of this
section shall not become effective unless and until the
general assembly adopts a concurrent resolution in
accordance with the provisions of Article IV, Section 8 of
the Missouri Constitution to approve such proposed rule.
4. Upon adoption of such concurrent resolution as
provided in subsection 3 of this section, the secretary of
state shall not publish the order of rulemaking until the
expiration of time necessary for such resolution to be
signed by the governor or vetoed and subsequently acted upon
by the general assembly as provided in Article III, Section
32 of the Missouri Constitution. If such concurrent
resolution is adopted and signed by the governor or
otherwise reconsidered under Article III, Section 32 of the
Missouri Constitution, the secretary of state shall publish
in the Missouri register, as soon as practicable, the order
of rulemaking along with notice of the proposed rules or
portions thereof that were approved by the general assembly.
5. Except for rules adopted pursuant to section
536.025 or required to be adopted to conform with federal
law or for federal funding, any proposed rule shall be null,
void, and unenforceable unless made in accordance with the
provisions of this section.
536.185. A state agency shall not file any notice of
proposed rulemaking with the secretary of state without
first receiving from and including a copy of the written
approval by the governor.
✓